North Dakota statutes. TITLE 59 Trusts
CHAPTER 59-03 Trusts Relating to Realty [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27]

59-03-01.
Application of chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-02.
Purposes for which express trusts created. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-03.
Requisites of trust relating to real property. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-03.1.
Trustee to convey and transfer real estate. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-04.
Direct transfer of realty necessary. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-05.
Legal estate deemed vested in person with right to possession and profits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-06.
Trusts valid if connected with power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-07.
Implied trusts not affected by foregoing provisions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-08.
Innocent purchaser protected against implied trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-09.
Protection of creditors and purchasers without notice of trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-10.
When creditors of beneficiary may reach trust profits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-11.
Power in trust not prohibited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-12.
When devise valid as power in trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-13.
When trust valid as power in trust — Realty passes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-14.
Whole estate vests in trustees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-15.
Trustor may prescribe disposition if trust fails or ends. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-16.
Estate of grantee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-17.
Disposition of estates not embraced in trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-18.
Beneficiary restrained from disposing of interest. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-19.
When transfer of trustee void. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-03-20.
When estate of trustee ceases. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.